Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.370

Revenue bonds—Issuance, form, seal, etc.

(1) When revenue bonds are issued for authorized purposes, said bonds shall be either registered as to principal only or principal and interest as provided in RCW 39.46.030 or shall be bearer bonds; shall be in such denominations, shall be numbered, shall bear such date, shall be payable at such time or times up to a maximum period of not to exceed thirty years and payable as determined by the park and recreation commissioners of the district; shall bear interest payable semiannually; shall be executed by the chair of the board of park and recreation commissioners, and attested by the secretary of the board, and the seal of such board shall be affixed to each bond, but not to any coupon; and may have facsimile signatures of the chair and the secretary imprinted on any interest coupons in lieu of original signatures.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4105; 1983 c 167 s 86; 1972 ex.s. c 94 s 5.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.